Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Tennessee Investor Protection Act

48-103-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Investor Protection Act.”

Acts 1976, ch. 536, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-2101, 48-5-101, 48-35-101.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 42,

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of the Market for Corporate Control: MITE, CTS, and Their Progeny (M. Wayne Marr, Robert W. Mouton), 20 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1989).

48-103-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affiliate” of a person means any person controlling, controlled by or under common control with such person. For purposes of this section, “control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise;

“Associate” of a person means:

Any corporation or other organization of which such person is an officer or partner or is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of ten percent (10%) or more of any class of equity securities;

Any person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of ten percent (10%) or more of any class of equity securities of such person;

Any trust or other estate in which such person has a substantial beneficial interest or as to which such person serves as a trustee or in a similar fiduciary capacity; and

Any relative or spouse of such person or any relative of such spouse, any one (1) of whom has the same home as such person;

“Broker-dealer” means any person engaged, directly or indirectly, as agent, broker or principal, in the business of purchasing, offering, selling or otherwise dealing or trading in securities for the account of others or for such person's own account. “Broker-dealer” includes “broker-dealer” as defined in § 48-1-102;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce and insurance;

“Equity security” means any share of stock or similar securities, or any securities convertible into such securities, or carrying any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase such securities, or any such warrant or right, or any other security which the commissioner shall consider necessary or appropriate, by such rules and regulations as the commissioner may prescribe in the public interest or for the protection of investors, to deem to be an equity security;

“Offeree” means the record holder and beneficial owner of equity securities which an offeror acquires or offers to acquire in connection with a takeover offer;

“Offeree company” means a corporation or other issuer of equity securities which is incorporated or organized under the laws of this state or has its principal office in this state, which has substantial assets located in this state, and which is or may be involved in a takeover offer relating to any class of its equity securities;

“Offeror” means a person who makes or in any way participates in making a takeover offer, and includes all affiliates and associates of that person and all persons acting jointly or in concert for the purpose of acquiring, holding or disposing of or exercising any voting rights attaching to the equity securities for which a takeover offer is made;

“Offeror” does not include any bank or broker-dealer loaning funds to an offeror in the ordinary course of its business, or any bank, broker-dealer, attorney, accountant, consultant, employee, or other person furnishing information or advice to or performing ministerial duties for an offeror and not otherwise participating in the takeover offer;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, limited partnership, syndicate, corporation, joint-stock company, unincorporated organization, trust or association; and

“Takeover offer” means the offer to acquire or the acquisition of any equity security of an offeree company, pursuant to a tender offer or request or invitation for tenders, if after the acquisition thereof the offeror would be directly or indirectly a beneficial owner of more than ten percent (10%) of any class of the outstanding equity securities of the offeree company;

“Takeover offer” does not include an offer to acquire or acquisition of any equity security of an offeree company pursuant to:

Broker transactions effected by or through a broker-dealer in the ordinary course of its business when such transactions are not entered into for the purpose of, and not having the effect of, changing or influencing the control or management of the offeree company;

An exchange offer for equity securities of another issuer if the offer is for the sole account of the offeror, is in good faith and not for the purpose of avoiding this section, and is exempt pursuant to § 4 of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77d), as amended, and does not involve any public offering;

An offer made in isolated transactions, for the sole account of the offeror, in good faith and not for the purpose of avoiding this section, to not more than fifteen (15) persons in this state during any period of twelve (12) consecutive months;

An offer made on substantially equal terms to holders of record of any class of the equity securities of the offeree company, if the number of such holders does not exceed fifty (50) at the time of the offer; or

An offer made on substantially equal terms to all shareholders and as to which the offeree company, acting through its board of directors, has recommended acceptance to such shareholders, if the terms thereof, including any inducements to officers or directors which are not available to all shareholders, have been disclosed to such shareholders.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., § 48-2102; Acts 1985, ch. 361, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 48-5-102, 48-35-102.

48-103-103. Limitations on offerors.

No offeror shall make a takeover offer if the offeror beneficially owns, directly or indirectly, five percent (5%) or more of any class of the equity securities of the offeree company, any of which were purchased within one (1) year before the proposed takeover offer, unless the offeror, before making such purchase, has made a public announcement of the offeror's intention with respect to changing or influencing the management or control of the offeree company, has made a full, fair and effective disclosure of such intention to the persons from whom the offeror intends to acquire such securities, and has filed with the commissioner and with the offeree company a statement signifying such intentions and containing such additional information as the commissioner by rule prescribes.

No offeror may make a takeover offer involving an offeree company which is not made to the holders of record or beneficial owners of the equity securities of the offeree company who reside in this state, or which is not made to such persons on substantially the same terms as the offer is made to those holders or owners who reside outside this state.

An offeror shall provide that any equity securities of an offeree company deposited or tendered pursuant to a takeover offer may be withdrawn by or on behalf of any offeree at any time within seven (7) days from the date the offer has become effective under this part, or after sixty (60) days from the date the offer has become effective under this part, except as the commissioner may otherwise prescribe by rule or order for the protection of investors.

If an offeror makes a takeover offer for less than all the outstanding equity securities of any class, and if the number of securities deposited or tendered pursuant thereto within ten (10) days after the offer has become effective under this part and copies of the offer or notice of any increase in the consideration offered, are first published or sent or given to offerees is greater than the number the offeror has offered to accept and pay for, the securities shall be accepted pro rata, disregarding fractions, according to the number of securities deposited or tendered by or on behalf of each offeree.

If an offeror varies the terms of a takeover offer before its expiration date by increasing the consideration offered to offerees, the offeror shall pay the increased consideration for all equity securities accepted, whether such securities have been accepted by the offeror before or after the variation in the terms of the offer.

No offeror may acquire, remove or exercise control, directly or indirectly, over any assets of an offeree company located in this state in connection with a takeover offer unless the takeover offer is effective or exempt under this part, except as permitted by order of the commissioner.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., § 48-2103; Acts 1985, ch. 361, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-5-103, 48-35-103.

Law Reviews.

Securities Issuer Liability for Third Party Misstatements: Refining the Entanglement Standard, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 947 (2000).

48-103-104. Registration of takeover offers.

It is unlawful for any person to make a takeover offer involving an offeree company or to acquire any equity security of an offeree company pursuant to a takeover offer, unless such offer is effective under this part or is exempted by rule or order of the commissioner. Before a takeover offer can become effective under this part, the offeror shall file with the commissioner a registration statement containing the information prescribed in subsection (b) and, not later than the date of filing the registration statement, send a copy of the registration statement by certified mail to the offeree company at its principal office and publicly disclose the material terms of the proposed offer.

The registration statement shall be filed on forms prescribed by the commissioner and shall be accompanied by the consent to service of process specified in § 48-103-107, and the filing fee specified in § 48-103-109, and shall contain the following information and such additional information as the commissioner by rule or order prescribes:

The identity and background of all persons by whom or on whose behalf the acquisition of any equity security of the offeree company has been or is to be effected;

The course and amount of funds or other consideration used or to be used in acquiring any equity security, including a statement describing any securities which are being offered in exchange for the equity securities of the offeree company, and if any part of the acquisition price is or will be represented by borrowed funds or other consideration, a description of the transaction and the names of the parties thereto, except that where a source of funds is a loan made in the ordinary course of business by a bank, if the person filing such statement so requests, the name of the bank shall not be made available to the public;

If the purpose of the acquisition is to gain control of the offeree company, a statement of any plans or proposals which such person has, upon gaining control, to liquidate the offeree company, relocate any operations of the company, sell its assets, effect its merger or consolidation, or make any other changes in its business, corporate structure, management or personnel;

The number of shares or units of any equity security of the offeree company of which each such person and each associate of such person and each person included as an offeror is the beneficial owner or which each such person has a right to acquire, directly or indirectly, together with the name and address of each such person;

Material information as to any contracts, arrangements or understanding with any person with respect to any equity security of the offeree company, including transfers of any equity security, joint ventures, loan or option agreements, puts and calls, guarantees of loan, guarantees against loss, guarantees of profits, division of losses or profits, or the giving or withholding of proxies, naming the persons with whom such contracts, arrangements or understanding have been entered into;

Material information concerning the organization and operations of any offeror which is a corporation, including the year, form and jurisdiction of its organization, a description of the business done by the offeror and any material changes therein during the past three (3) years, a description of each class of the offeror's capital stock and its long-term debt, a description of the location and character of the principal properties of the offeror and its subsidiaries, a description of any pending legal or administrative proceedings which is material to the offer in which the offeror or any of its subsidiaries is a party, the names of all directors and executive officers of the offeror and their material business activities and affiliations during the past three (3) years, and financial statements of the offeror for its three (3) most recent annual accounting periods and most recent quarterly period;

Material information concerning the identity and background of any offeror who is not a corporation, including the offeror's material business activities and affiliations during the past three (3) years, such financial statements of the offeror as may be prescribed by rule or order of the commissioner, and a description of any material pending legal or administrative proceedings in which the offeror is a party; and

Three (3) copies of the proposed takeover offer, including all material terms thereof, in the form proposed to be published, sent or delivered to offerees.

The commissioner may require the offeror to file any other documents, exhibits and information that the commissioner deems material to the takeover offer, and the commissioner may permit the omission of any of the information specified in subsection (b) if the commissioner determines that such information is not required for the protection of offerees.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., § 48-2104; Acts 1985, ch. 361, §§ 3-7; T.C.A., §§ 48-5-104, 48-35-104.

Law Reviews.

Defensive Tactics in Tender Offers — Does Anything Go? (Daniel J. Morrissey), 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 103 (1985).

48-103-105. Filing of solicitation materials.

Copies of all advertisements, circulars, letters or other materials of the offeror or the offeree company, soliciting or requesting the acceptance or rejection of the takeover offer, shall be filed with the commissioner and sent to the offeree company or offeror, respectively, not later than the time copies of such solicitation materials are first published or used or sent to offerees.

Solicitation materials used in connection with a takeover offer shall not contain any false statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make any statement made therein not misleading. The commissioner may by rule or order prohibit the use of any solicitation material deemed by the commissioner to be false or misleading.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-2105, 48-5-105, 48-35-105.

48-103-106. Fraudulent and deceptive practices.

It is unlawful for any offeror or offeree company, or any affiliate or associate of an offeror or offeree company, or any broker-dealer acting on behalf of any offeror or offeree company to engage in any fraudulent, deceptive or manipulative acts or practices in connection with a takeover offer. Fraudulent, deceptive and manipulative acts or practices include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Publication, or use in connection with the offer, of any false statement of a material fact or omitting to state a material fact necessary to make any statement made by such entity which is not misleading, but not including the mailing by an offeree company to its shareholders of solicitation materials published by an offeror;

Sale by an officer, director, affiliate or associate of an offeree company in connection with a takeover offer of all or part of their equity securities to the offeror at a price higher than that to be paid to other offerees pursuant to the offer;

Refusal by an offeree company to permit, if required to do so by the applicable state corporation statute, an offeror who is a shareholder of record to examine its list of shareholders and to make extracts therefrom for the purpose of making a takeover offer in compliance with this part; and

Acquisition by or through a broker-dealer acting on behalf of an offeror of any equity security of the offeree company in connection with a takeover offer, unless such takeover offer is effective under this part or exempted by rule or order of the commissioner, or unless the broker-dealer did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, that the person for whom it acted was an offeror or that the acquisition was in connection with a takeover offer. The provisions and penalties of §§ 48-1-112 and 48-1-118 shall apply to broker-dealers who engage in any fraudulent, deceptive or manipulative acts or practices in connection with a takeover offer and who are registered as broker-dealers pursuant to chapter 1 of this title.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-2106, 48-5-106, 48-35-106.

Law Reviews.

Defensive Tactics in Tender Offers — Does Anything Go? (Daniel J. Morrissey), 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 103 (1985).

48-103-107. Consent to service.

Upon any application for registration of a takeover offer, there shall be filed with the application the irrevocable written consent of the offeror that in suits, proceedings and actions growing out of this part, the service on the commissioner of any notice, process or pleading therein authorized by the laws of this state shall be as valid and binding as if due service had been made on the offeror.

The form of such consent shall be prescribed by the commissioner.

Service of any notice, process or pleadings in any suits, proceedings and actions growing out of the violation of this part against an offeror who has filed a consent to service with the commissioner shall, if made on the commissioner, be by duplicate copies, one (1) of which shall be filed in the office of the commissioner and the other immediately forwarded by the commissioner by registered mail to the principal office of the offeror against which the notice, process or pleadings are directed.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-2107, 48-5-107, 48-35-107.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

48-103-108. Administration — Rules and orders — Hearings.

This part shall be administered by the commissioner, who may exercise all powers granted to the commissioner by chapter 1 of this title which are not inconsistent with this part.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations, consistent with this part, as are necessary to the administration thereof in carrying out the powers and duties vested in the commissioner by this part.

The commissioner may by rule or order exempt from any provisions of this part takeover offers that the commissioner determines are not made for the purpose or do not have the effect of changing or influencing the control of an offeree company or where compliance with this part is not necessary for the protection of the shareholders of the offeree company, and the commissioner may similarly exempt any persons from the filing of statements under this part.

The commissioner may by order direct any person to file any statement provided for in this part, if it appears that such person is delinquent in the filing of such statement.

All hearings before the commissioner shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and each party to such proceeding shall have all the procedural rights set out therein including, but not limited to, the right to proper notice, the right to confront witnesses and examine the evidence against the party, the right to cross-examine witnesses, the right to counsel, the right to present evidence in the party's own behalf and the right to subpoena witnesses, books, records, papers and other objects. Such hearing may, at the option of the agency and upon agreement by the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee, be conducted by a hearing officer from the administrative procedures division of the secretary of state's office. Judicial review of the final agency decision in a contested case shall also be in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The commissioner has the authority to promulgate rules in order to effectuate the purposes and objectives set out in this part, and such rules shall be promulgated and published in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. As provided in that chapter, any interested person has the right to petition the agency for the adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule or to petition the agency involved for a ruling on the applicability of a rule to any person, property or state of facts.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-2108, 48-5-108, 48-35-108.

48-103-109. Fees and expenses.

The commissioner shall charge a filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for a registration statement filed by an offeror and one hundred dollars ($100) for a request for hearing filed by an offeree company.

The expenses reasonably attributable to any hearing held under this part shall be charged ratably to the offeror and the offeree company, unless otherwise ordered by the commissioner.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-2109, 48-5-109, 48-35-109.

48-103-110. Injunction.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person, including an affiliate or associate of an offeror or offeree company, has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of this part or any rule or order hereunder, the commissioner may apply for equitable relief to the chancery court of Davidson County, or any other chancery court having jurisdiction. Upon a proper showing, the court may grant a permanent or temporary injunction or restraining order, or may order recision of any sales or purchases of securities determined to be unlawful under this part or any rule or order hereunder. The court shall not require the commissioner to post a bond.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-2110, 48-5-110, 48-35-110.

48-103-111. Criminal penalties.

Any person, including an affiliate or associate of an offeror or offeree company, who knowingly violates any provision of this part, or any rule promulgated under this part, or any order issued by the commissioner under any provision of this part, commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly engages in a fraudulent practice declared unlawful in § 48-103-106 commits a Class E felony.

The commissioner may transmit such evidence as may be available concerning violations of this part or of any rule or order hereunder to the district attorney general in the district in which the offense was committed who may, in the district attorney general's discretion, institute criminal proceedings to enforce the penalties prescribed in this part.

Nothing in this part limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime under any other statute.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-2111, 48-5-111; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 44, 111; T.C.A., § 48-35-111.

Code Commission Notes.

Portions of this section have been rewritten by the executive secretary to the Tennessee code commission to implement Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111, effective November 1, 1989, which requested that the executive secretary amend this section by deleting the penalty provision and inserting language to indicate violation of the section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

48-103-112. Civil liabilities.

Any offeror, who purchases a security in connection with a takeover offer not in compliance with this part or by means of any false statement of a material fact or omission to state a material fact necessary to make any statement made by the offeror not misleading, shall be liable to the person selling the security to the offeror, who may sue either at law or in equity to recover the security, plus any income received by the offeror thereon, upon tender of the consideration received, or for damages. Damages are the excess of either the value of the security on the date of purchase or its present value, whichever is greater, over the present value of the consideration received for the security. Tender requires only notice of willingness to pay the amount specified in exchange for the security. Any notice may be given by service as provided in § 48-103-107 or by certified mail to the last known address of the person liable.

Every person who directly or indirectly controls a person liable under subsection (a), every partner, principal executive officer or director of such person, every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, every employee of such person who materially aids in the act or transaction constituting the violation, and every broker-dealer or agent who materially aids in the act or transaction constituting the violation, is also liable jointly or severally with and to the same extent as such person, unless the person liable hereunder proves that the person liable did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of facts by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist. There is contribution as in cases of contract among the several persons so liable.

No action may be maintained under this section unless commenced before the expiration of two (2) years after the act or transaction constituting the violation.

The rights and remedies under this part are in addition to any other rights or remedies that may exist in law or equity.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-2112, 48-5-112, 48-35-112.

48-103-113. Applicability of part.

This part does not apply to “state banks” as defined in § 45-1-103, to “savings and loan associations,” as defined by § 45-3-104, or to “public utilities,” as defined by § 65-4-101.

If the offeree company is a domestic insurance company whose takeover is subject to title 56, chapter 10, part 2, this part shall not apply and title 56, chapter 10, part 2 shall control. For purposes of this section, “domestic insurance company” has the meaning as that set forth in § 56-10-201.

This part shall not apply to public utilities, public utility holding companies, national banking associations, bank holding companies or savings and loan associations subject to regulation by a federal agency.

This part shall not apply to any offer involving a vote by holders of equity securities of the offeree company, pursuant to its charter or articles of incorporation or the applicable corporation statute, on a merger, consolidation or sale of corporate assets in consideration of the issuance of securities of another corporation, or on a sale of its securities in exchange for cash or securities of another corporation.

Acts 1976, ch. 536, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 708, §§ 1.04, 5.25, 6.01; 1979, ch. 315, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 48-2114, 48-5-114, 48-35-113.